Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5071.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 175,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 175,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Violence against women $ 175,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 175,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $0.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. Federal grant funding received from the United States Department of Justice Office on Violence Against Women and appropriated in part 1 for violence against women must be used by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 the department for both of the following: (a) To support contractors and experts that provide training on how to recognize and treat domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, and stalking as serious violations. (b) To support law enforcement, prosecution, victim services, and court responses to domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, and stalking, including collaborating to develop and enforce arrest policies and policies aimed at enforcement of protection orders.